Nebraska, session 109, LB249.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1001 Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, the department shall determine the military impact
funding to be paid to each school district in accordance with this
section.
(2) A district shall receive military impact funding in an amount
calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section if the district
received a basic support payment of federal impact aid under section 7003
of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 in the
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which
the aid is to be calculated and the district provides free public
education to federally connected children whose parents are on active
duty in the uniformed services.
(3) For purposes of the calculation of military impact funding
pursuant to this section:
(a) Per-pupil federal impact aid amount means the amount calculated
by dividing (i) the amount the district received as a basic support
payment of federal impact aid under section 7003 of the federal
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 in the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which the aid is to be
calculated by (ii) the number of federally connected children whose
parents are on active duty in the uniformed services actually enrolled in
the district as of the day of the fall membership count pursuant to
section 79-528; and
(b) Per-pupil general fund tax levy means the amount calculated by
dividing (i) the total local property tax levy receipts of such district
from the preceding school fiscal year by (ii) the fall membership of such
-2-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
district, without the inclusion of federally connected children whose
parents are on active duty in the uniformed services and who otherwise
are included in the calculation of the fall membership.
(4)(a) The amount of military impact funding provided to a district
shall be calculated by (i) subtracting the per-pupil federal impact aid
from the per-pupil general fund tax levy and (ii) multiplying the amount
calculated in subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection by the number of
federally connected children whose parents are on active duty in the
uniformed services actually enrolled in the district as of the day of the
fall membership count pursuant to section 79-528.
(b) A district's military impact funding shall be zero if the amount
calculated pursuant to subdivision (4)(a)(i) produces a negative result.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1017.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1017.01 (1) For state aid calculated for each school fiscal year
prior to school fiscal year 2023-24, local system formula resources
includes other actual receipts determined pursuant to section 79-1018.01,
net option funding determined pursuant to section 79-1009, allocated
income tax funds determined pursuant to section 79-1005.01, and community
achievement plan aid determined pursuant to section 79-1005, and is
reduced by amounts paid by the district in the most recently available
complete data year as property tax refunds pursuant to or in the manner
prescribed by section 77-1736.06.
(2) For state aid calculated for school fiscal years year 2023-24
and 2024-25 each school fiscal year thereafter, local system formula
resources includes other actual receipts determined pursuant to section
79-1018.01, net option funding determined pursuant to section 79-1009,
allocated income tax funds determined pursuant to section 79-1005.01,
community achievement plan aid determined pursuant to section 79-1005,
and a percentage of foundation aid determined pursuant to section
79-1006, and is reduced by amounts paid by the district in the most
-3-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
recently available complete data year as property tax refunds pursuant to
or in the manner prescribed by section 77-1736.06.
(3) For state aid calculated for school fiscal year 2025-26 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, local system formula resources includes
other actual receipts determined pursuant to section 79-1018.01, net
option funding determined pursuant to section 79-1009, allocated income
tax funds determined pursuant to section 79-1005.01, community
achievement plan aid determined pursuant to section 79-1005, a percentage
of foundation aid determined pursuant to section 79-1006, and military
impact funding pursuant to section 2 of this act, and is reduced by
amounts paid by the district in the most recently available complete data
year as property tax refunds pursuant to or in the manner prescribed by
section 77-1736.06.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2025 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
-4-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2025-26 2023-24 are null and void.
Sec. 6. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
-5-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
to such student growth adjustment.
Sec. 7. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
Average daily Allowable
membership of reserve
district percentage
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
-6-

LB249 LB249
2025 2025
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 8. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 79-1001, 79-1017.01, 79-1022, 79-1022.02,
79-1023, 79-1027, and 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-